Alaska, session 34, HB313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.20 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Article 8. Professional Employee Organizations. 06 Sec. 14.20.700. Restrictions relating to professional employee 07 organizations in public schools. (a) If the governing body of a school district allows 08 a professional employee organization to 09 (1) use school facilities or school communication systems, including 10 physical or electronic mailboxes, to communicate with or recruit members, the 11 governing body shall allow any professional employee organization equal access upon 12 the request of the organization; 13 (2) attend or participate in an orientation or meeting for new or 14 existing employees, the governing body shall allow any professional employee 01 organization an equal opportunity to participate in the orientation or meeting upon the 02 request of the organization. 03 (b) The governing body of a school district may not 04 (1) use the name or acronym of a professional employee organization 05 to identify a special day, school holiday, or school break on a school district calendar; 06 or 07 (2) grant exclusive access to school facilities or communication 08 systems to a professional employee organization. 09 (c) In this section, "professional employee organization" or "organization" 10 means an organization of professional employees that has as its primary purpose the 11 improvement of instruction and the professional status of its members. 12 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.